District of Columbia statutes.
29-411.01

Definition.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term “derivative proceeding” means a civil action in the right of a domestic nonprofit corporation or, to the extent provided in § 29-411.08, in the right of a foreign nonprofit corporation.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720